Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 1. Juvenile Delinquency.
Sec. 47.12.110.
Hearings.

The court shall conduct a hearing on the petition. The court shall give notice of the hearing to the department, and the department shall send a representative to the hearing. The representative of the department may also be heard at the hearing. The department shall give notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition to the minor’s foster parent, and the court shall give the foster parent an opportunity to be heard at the hearing. The public shall be excluded from the hearing, but the court, in its discretion, may permit individuals to attend a hearing if their attendance is compatible with the best interests of the minor. Nothing in this section may be applied in such a way as to deny a minor’s rights to confront adverse witnesses, to a public trial, and to a trial by jury.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section or an order prohibiting or limiting the public made under (e) of this section, the victim of an offense that a minor is alleged to have committed, or the designee of the victim, has a right to be present at all hearings or proceedings held under this section at which the minor has a right to be present. If the minor is found to have committed the offense, the victim may at the disposition hearing give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation concerning the offense and its effect on the victim. If there are numerous victims of a minor’s offense, the court may limit the number of victims who may give sworn testimony or make an unsworn oral presentation, but the court may not limit the right of a victim to attend a hearing even if the victim is likely to be a witness in a hearing concerning the minor’s alleged offense.

[Repealed, § 54 ch 107 SLA 1998.]

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a court hearing on a petition seeking the adjudication of a minor as a delinquent shall be open to the public, except as prohibited or limited by order of the court, if

the department files with the court a motion asking the court to open the hearing to the public, and the petition seeking adjudication of the minor as a delinquent is based on

the minor’s alleged commission of an offense, and the minor has knowingly failed to comply with all the terms and conditions required of the minor by the department or imposed on the minor in a court order entered under AS

47.12.040(a)(2)

or

47.12.120

;

the minor’s alleged commission of

a crime against a person that is punishable as a felony;

a crime in which the minor employed a deadly weapon, as that term is defined in AS

11.81.900(b)

, in committing the crime;

arson under AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.410

;

burglary under AS

11.46.300

;

distribution of child pornography under AS

11.61.125

;

sex trafficking in the first degree under AS

11.66.110

; or

misconduct involving a controlled substance under AS 11.71 involving the delivery of a controlled substance or the possession of a controlled substance with intent to deliver, other than an offense under AS

11.71.040

or

11.71.050

; or

the minor’s alleged commission of a felony and the minor was 16 years of age or older at the time of commission of the offense when the minor has previously been convicted or adjudicated a delinquent minor based on the minor’s commission of an offense that is a felony; or

the minor agrees to a public hearing on the petition seeking adjudication of the minor as a delinquent.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a court proceeding shall be open to the public, except as prohibited or limited by order of the court, when the district attorney has elected to seek imposition of a dual sentence and a petition has been filed under AS

47.12.065

, or when a minor agrees as part of a plea agreement to be subject to dual sentencing.

During jury selection or as part of an opening statement at the hearing, the attorney representing the department may introduce the victim to the jury, and the attorney for the minor may introduce the minor to the jury.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 19 ch 63 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 64 SLA 1997; am §§ 20 — 22, 54 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 40 SLA 1999; am § 6 ch 65 SLA 2005; am § 24 ch 1 TSSLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For legislative purpose concerning the amendments to this section made by § 19,
ch. 63, SLA 1997 see § 1, ch. 63, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts. For effect of subsection (e) on Alaska Delinquency Rules 3 and 21, see § 55,
ch. 107, SLA 1998 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For effect of the amendment made by § 4,
ch. 40, SLA 1999 on the Alaska Delinquency Rules, see § 10,
ch. 40, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts. For use of photographic evidence of property taken or damaged, see
AS

12.45.086

.

Administrative Code. —

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For confidentiality of client records: juvenile justice, see 7 AAC 54, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2005 amendment, effective July 14, 2005, added subsection (f).

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “sex trafficking” for “promoting prostitution” in sub-subparagraph (d)(1)(B)(vi).

Editor’s notes. —

For text of the 2005 amendment to Alaska Delinquency Rule 3(e) relating to a minor’s presence and participation in hearings described in this section, see § 9, ch. 70, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.
Under sec. 11(b), ch. 70, SLA 2005, the 2005 amendment to Alaska Delinquency Rule 3(e) by § 9, ch. 70, SLA 2005, “[applies] to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Section 8, ch. 65, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 enactment of (f) of this section has the effect of amending Rule 21, Alaska Delinquency Rules, by allowing introduction of the minor and the victim at an adjudication hearing.

Section 27(a), ch. 1, TSSLA 2012, provides that the 2012 amendment to (d)(1)(B)(vi) of this section applies to offenses committed before, on, or after July 1, 2012.

Sec. 47.12.120.
Judgments and orders.

The court, at the conclusion of the hearing, or thereafter as the circumstances of the case may require, shall find and enter a judgment that the minor is or is not delinquent.

If the minor is not subject to (j) of this section and the court finds that the minor is delinquent, it shall

order the minor committed to the department for a period of time not to exceed two years or in any event extend past the day the minor becomes 19 years of age, except that the department may petition for and the court may grant in a hearing (A) two-year extensions of commitment that do not extend beyond the minor’s 19th birthday if the extension is in the best interests of the minor and the public; and (B) an additional one-year period of supervision past age 19 if continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it; the department shall place the minor in the juvenile facility that the department considers appropriate and that may include a juvenile treatment facility, juvenile detention facility, or secure residential psychiatric treatment center; the minor may be released from placement or detention and placed on probation on order of the court and may also be released by the department, in its discretion, under AS

47.12.260

;

order the minor placed on probation, to be supervised by the department, and released to the minor’s parents, guardian, or a suitable person; if the court orders the minor placed on probation, it may specify the terms and conditions of probation; the probation may be for a period of time not to exceed two years and in no event to extend past the day the minor becomes 19 years of age, except that the department may petition for and the court may grant in a hearing

two-year extensions of supervision that do not extend beyond the minor’s 19th birthday if the extension is in the best interests of the minor and the public; and

an additional one-year period of supervision past age 19 if the continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it;

order the minor committed to the custody of the department and placed on probation, to be supervised by the department and released to the minor’s parents, guardian, other suitable person, or suitable nondetention setting such as with a relative or in a foster home or residential child care facility, whichever the department considers appropriate to implement the treatment plan of the predisposition report; if the court orders the minor placed on probation, it may specify the terms and conditions of probation; the department may transfer the minor, in the minor’s best interests, from one of the probationary placement settings listed in this paragraph to another, and the minor, the minor’s parents or guardian, the minor’s foster parent, and the minor’s attorney are entitled to reasonable notice of the transfer; the probation may be for a period of time not to exceed two years and in no event to extend past the day the minor becomes 19 years of age, except that the department may petition for and the court may grant in a hearing

two-year extensions of commitment that do not extend beyond the minor’s 19th birthday if the extension is in the best interests of the minor and the public; and

an additional one-year period of supervision past age 19 if the continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it;

order the minor and the minor’s parent to make suitable restitution in lieu of or in addition to the court’s order under (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection; under this paragraph,

except as provided in (B) of this paragraph, the court may not refuse to make an order of restitution to benefit the victim of the act of the minor that is the basis of the delinquency adjudication; under this subparagraph, the court may require the minor to use the services of a community dispute resolution center that has been recognized by the commissioner under AS

47.12.450(b)

to resolve any dispute between the minor and the victim of the minor’s offense as to the amount of or manner of payment of the restitution;

the court may not order payment of restitution by the parent of a minor who is a runaway or missing minor for an act of the minor that was committed by the minor after the parent has made a report to a law enforcement agency, as authorized by AS

47.10.141(a)

, that the minor has run away or is missing; for purposes of this subparagraph, “runaway or missing minor” means a minor who a parent reasonably believes is absent from the minor’s residence for the purpose of evading the parent or who is otherwise missing from the minor’s usual place of abode without the consent of the parent; and

at the request of the department, the Department of Law, the victims’ advocate, or on its own motion, the court shall, at any time, order the minor and the minor’s parent, if applicable, to submit financial information on a form approved by the Alaska Court System to the court, the department, and the Department of Law for the purpose of establishing the amount of restitution or enforcing an order of restitution under AS

47.12.170

; the form must include a warning that submission of incomplete or inaccurate information is punishable as unsworn falsification in the second degree under AS

11.56.210

;

order the minor committed to the department for placement in an adventure-based education program established under AS

47.21.020

with conditions the court considers appropriate concerning release upon satisfactory completion of the program or commitment under (1) of this subsection if the program is not satisfactorily completed;

in addition to an order under (1) — (5) of this subsection, order the minor to perform community service; for purposes of this paragraph, “community service” includes work

on a project identified in AS

33.30.901

; or

that, on the recommendation of the city council or traditional village council, would benefit persons within the city or village who are elderly or disabled; or

in addition to an order under (1) — (6) of this subsection, order the minor’s parent or guardian to comply with orders made under AS

47.12.155

, including participation in treatment under AS

47.12.155(b)(1)

.

If the court finds that the minor is not delinquent, it shall immediately order the minor released from the department’s custody and returned to the minor’s parents, guardian, or custodian, and dismiss the case.

A minor found to be delinquent is a ward of the state while committed to the department or while the department has the power to supervise the minor’s actions. The court shall review an order made under (b) of this section annually and may review the order more frequently to determine if continued placement, probation, or supervision, as it is being provided, is in the best interest of the minor and the public. The department, the minor, and the minor’s parents, guardian, or custodian are entitled, when good cause is shown, to a review on application. If the application is granted, the court shall afford these parties and their counsel and the minor’s foster parent reasonable notice in advance of the review and hold a hearing where these parties and their counsel and the minor’s foster parent shall be afforded an opportunity to be heard. The minor shall be afforded the opportunity to be present at the review.

The department shall pay all court costs incurred in all proceedings in connection with the adjudication of delinquency under this chapter, including hearings that result in the release of the minor.

A minor, the minor’s parents or guardian acting on the minor’s behalf, or the department may appeal a judgment or order, or the stay, modification, setting aside, revocation, or enlargement of a judgment or order issued by the court under this chapter.

[Repealed, § 54 ch 107 SLA 1998.]

[Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

When, under (a) of this section, the court enters judgment finding that a minor is delinquent, the court may order the minor temporarily detained pending entry of its dispositional order if the court finds that detention is necessary

to protect the minor or the community; or

to ensure the minor’s appearance at a subsequent court hearing.

If, in a case in which a district attorney has elected to seek imposition of a dual sentence under AS

47.12.065

, the court finds that the minor is delinquent for committing an offense in the circumstances set out in AS

47.12.065

, or if the minor agrees as part of a plea agreement to be subject to dual sentencing, the court shall

enter one or more orders under (b) of this section; and

pronounce a sentence for the offense in accordance with the provisions of AS 12.55; however, the sentence pronounced under this paragraph must include some period of imprisonment that is not suspended by the court.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016.]

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 144 SLA 1996; am § 6 ch 94 SLA 1997; am §§ 23 — 25, 54 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 108 SLA 1998; am §§ 5, 6 ch 40 SLA 1999; am § 17 ch 65 SLA 2001; am § 3 ch 23 SLA 2002; am § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003; am § 33 ch 42 SLA 2006; am § 22 ch 32 SLA 2016; am § 27 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under § 7, ch. 144, SLA 1996, the amendments made by § 3, ch. 144, SLA 1996 to AS

47.10.080

were made to this section instead. Also, in 1996, in (b)(7) of this section “AS

47.12.155

” was substituted for “AS 47.12.079” in two places to reflect the 1996 renumbering of AS 47.12.079.

Administrative Code. —

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, repealed subsection (h).

The 2006 amendment, effective July 1, 2006, inserted “in the second degree” in subparagraph (b)(4)(C).

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, repealed (k).

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (b)(1), near the end, substituted “juvenile treatment facility, juvenile detention facility, or secure residential psychiatric treatment center” for “juvenile correctional school, juvenile work camp, treatment facility, detention home, or detention facility”.

Sec. 47.12.130.
Predisposition hearing reports.

Before the disposition hearing of a delinquent minor, the department shall submit a predisposition report with a recommended plan of treatment to aid the court in its selection of a disposition, a victim impact statement reporting the information set out in AS

12.55.022

, and any further information that the court may request. In preparing the predisposition report, the department shall contact the victim of the minor’s offense.

The court shall inform the minor, the minor’s parents, and the attorneys representing the parties and the guardian ad litem that the predisposition report will be available to them not less than 10 days before the disposition hearing.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 23 SLA 2002.]

In this section, “parents” means the natural or adoptive parents, and any legal guardian, relative, or other adult person with whom the minor has resided and who has acted as a parent in providing for the minor for a continuous period of time before this action.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 35 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 6 ch 23 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was formerly (c); relettered in 2001.

Sec. 47.12.140.
Court dispositional order.

In making its dispositional order under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

— (3) and (5) and (j), the court shall

consider both the best interests of the minor and the interests of the public, and, in doing so, the court shall take into account

the seriousness of the minor’s delinquent act and the attitude of the minor and the minor’s parents toward that act;

the minor’s culpability as indicated by the circumstances of the particular case;

the age of the minor;

the minor’s prior criminal or juvenile record and the success or failure of any previous orders, dispositions, or placements imposed on the minor;

the effect of the dispositional order to be imposed in deterring the minor from committing other delinquent acts;

the need to commit the minor to the department’s custody or to detain the minor in a juvenile treatment facility, juvenile detention facility, secure residential psychiatric treatment center, or other suitable place in order to prevent further harm to the public;

the interest of the public in securing the minor’s rehabilitation; and

the ability of the state to take custody of and to care for the minor; and

order the least restrictive alternative disposition for the minor; for purposes of this paragraph, the “least restrictive alternative disposition” means that disposition that is no more restrictive than is, in the judgment of the court, most conducive to the minor’s rehabilitation taking into consideration the interests of the public.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 26 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 28 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (1)(F), substituted “in a juvenile treatment facility, juvenile detention facility, secure residential psychiatric treatment center,” for “in an institution.”

Sec. 47.12.150.
Legal custody, guardianship, and residual parental rights and responsibilities.

When a minor is committed to the department under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

or (3) or

47.12.240

, detained by the department on behalf of the Department of Corrections under AS

33.30.011

and AS

47.12.105

, or released under AS

47.12.120(b)(2)

to the minor’s parents, guardian, or other suitable person, a relationship of legal custody exists. This relationship imposes on the state and its authorized agents or the parents, guardian, or other suitable person the responsibility of physical care and control of the minor, the determination of where and with whom the minor shall live, the right and duty to protect, train, and discipline the minor, and the duty of providing the minor with food, shelter, education, and medical care. These obligations are subject to any residual parental rights and responsibilities and rights and responsibilities of a guardian if one has been appointed. When a minor is committed to the department and the department places the minor with the minor’s parent, the parent has the responsibility to provide and pay for food, shelter, education, and medical care for the minor. When parental rights have been terminated, or there are no living parents and a guardian has not been appointed, the responsibilities of legal custody include those in (b) and (c) of this section. The department or person having legal custody of the minor may delegate any of the responsibilities under this section, except authority to consent to marriage, adoption, and military enlistment may not be delegated. For purposes of this chapter, a person in charge of a placement setting is an agent of the department.

When a guardian is appointed for the minor, the court shall specify in its order the rights and responsibilities of the guardian. The guardian may be removed only by court order. The rights and responsibilities may include, but are not limited to, having the right and responsibility of reasonable visitation, consenting to marriage, consenting to military enlistment, consenting to major medical treatment, obtaining representation for the minor in legal actions, and making decisions of legal or financial significance concerning the minor.

When there has been transfer of legal custody or appointment of a guardian and parental rights have not been terminated by court decree, the parents shall have residual rights and responsibilities. These residual rights and responsibilities of the parent include the right and responsibility of reasonable visitation, consent to adoption, consent to marriage, consent to military enlistment, consent to major medical treatment except in cases of emergency or cases falling under AS

25.20.025

, and the responsibility for support, except if by court order any residual right and responsibility has been delegated to a guardian under (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 29 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration: children with disabilities, see 4 AAC 52, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (a), rewrote the first sentence, which read, “When a minor is committed under AS

47.12.120(b)(1)

or (3) to the department or released under AS

47.12.120(b)(2)

to the minor’s parents, guardian, or other suitable person, a relationship of legal custody exists.”, in the second sentence, substituted “imposes on the state” for “imposes on the department”.

Sec. 47.12.155.
Parental or guardian accountability and participation.

The parent or guardian of a minor who is alleged to be a delinquent under AS

47.12.020

or found to be a delinquent under AS

47.12.120

shall attend each hearing held during the delinquency proceedings unless the court excuses the parent or guardian from attendance for good cause.

If a minor is found to be a delinquent under AS

47.12.120

, the court may order that the minor’s parent or guardian

personally participate in treatment reasonably available in the parent’s or guardian’s location as specified in a plan set out in the court order;

notify the department if the minor violates a term or condition of the court order; and

comply with any other conditions set out in the court order, including a condition in an order requiring a parent to pay restitution ordered on behalf of a victim of a delinquent act.

If a court orders a minor’s parent or guardian to participate in treatment under (b) of this section, the court also shall order the parent or guardian to use any available insurance or another resource to cover the treatment, or to pay for the treatment if other coverage is unavailable. If the court determines that the parent or guardian is unable to pay for the treatment due to indigence and the department pays for the treatment, the department may seek reimbursement only from the indigent parent’s or guardian’s permanent fund dividend.

The permanent fund dividend of an indigent parent or guardian participating in treatment ordered under (b) of this section may be taken under AS

43.23.140(b)(6)

and

43.23.150

to satisfy the balance due on a reimbursement claim by the department under (c) of this section.

If a parent or guardian fails to attend a hearing as required in (a) of this section, the court shall hold the hearing without the attendance of the parent or guardian.

History.

(§ 2 ch 144 SLA 1996; am § 36 ch 92 SLA 2001)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.10.079; renumbered in 1996. In 1996, in subsection (a), “AS

47.12.020

” was substituted for “AS 47.10.010(a)(1)” and in subsections (a) and (b), “AS

47.12.120

” was substituted for “AS

47.10.080(b)

” under § 7, ch. 144, SLA 1996.

In 2018, “AS

43.23.140(b)(6)

and

43.23.150

” was substituted for “AS 43.23.065(b)(6) and

43.23.066

” to reflect the renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For applicability of the 2001 amendment of subsection (b) by § 36, ch. 92, SLA 2001, see § 45, ch. 92, SLA 2001, in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.12.160.
Retention of jurisdiction over minor.

Except as provided in (g) of this section, the court retains jurisdiction over the case and may at any time stay execution, modify, set aside, revoke, or enlarge a judgment or order, or grant a new hearing, in the exercise of its power of protection over the minor and for the minor’s best interest, for a period of time not to exceed the maximum period otherwise permitted by law or in any event extend past the day the minor becomes 19, unless sooner discharged by the court, except that the department may apply for and the court may grant an additional one-year period of supervision past age 19 if continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it. An application for any of these purposes may be made by the parent, guardian, or custodian acting in behalf of the minor, or the court may, on its own motion, and after reasonable notice to interested parties and the appropriate department, take action that it considers appropriate.

If the court determines at a hearing authorized by (a) of this section that it is in the best interests of the minor to be released to the care or custody of the minor’s parent, guardian, or custodian, it may enter an order to that effect and the minor is discharged from the control of the department.

If a minor is adjudicated a delinquent before the minor’s 18th birthday, the court may retain jurisdiction over the minor after the minor’s 18th birthday for the purpose of supervising the minor’s rehabilitation, but the court’s jurisdiction over the minor under this chapter never extends beyond the minor’s 19th birthday, except that the department may apply for and the court may grant an additional one-year period of supervision past age 19 if continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it. The department may retain jurisdiction over the person between the person’s 18th and 19th birthdays for the purpose of supervising the person’s rehabilitation, if the person has been placed under the supervision of the department before the person’s 18th birthday, except that the department may apply for and the court may grant an additional one-year period of supervision past age 19 if continued supervision is in the best interests of the person and the person consents to it.

The department, or the district attorney in a matter subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter under AS

47.12.020(b)

, may petition the court for imposition of sentence pronounced under AS

47.12.120(j)(2)

if the offender is still subject to the jurisdiction of the court and if the offender, after pronouncement of sentence under AS

47.12.120(j)(2)

,

commits a subsequent felony offense;

commits a subsequent offense against a person that is a misdemeanor and involves injury to a person or the use of a deadly weapon;

fails to comply with the terms of a restitution order;

fails to engage in or satisfactorily complete a rehabilitation program ordered by a court or required by a facility or juvenile probation officer; or

escapes from a juvenile or other correctional facility.

If a petition is filed under (d) of this section and if the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that the minor has committed a subsequent felony offense that is a crime against a person or is the crime of arson, the court shall impose the adult sentence previously pronounced under AS

47.12.120(j)

and, subject to AS

47.12.105

, transfer custody of the minor to the Department of Corrections. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that any of the other circumstances set out in (d)(1) — (5) of this section exist, the court shall impose the adult sentence previously pronounced and, subject to AS

47.12.105

, transfer custody of the minor to the Department of Corrections unless the minor proves by preponderance of the evidence that mitigating circumstances exist that justify a continuance in the stay of the adult sentence and the minor is amenable to further treatment under this chapter. The court shall make written findings to support its order.

Notwithstanding another provision of law, the court shall accept

payments of restitution from a minor and the minor’s parent at any time;and

prepayments of restitution or payments in anticipation of an order of restitution.

If the department has filed a delinquency petition under AS

47.12.020

and

47.12.040

regarding a minor who is 18 years of age or older, the court has jurisdiction to adjudicate and dispose of the matter as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 27 ch 107 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 17 SLA 2004; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 70 SLA 2005; am § 11 ch 21 SLA 2018; am § 30 ch 16 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective April 22, 2004, added subsection (f).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 14, 2005, added “Except as provided in (g) of this section” at the beginning of subsection (a); in subsection (d) inserted “, or the district attorney in a matter subject to the jurisdiction of this chapter under AS

47.12.020(b)

,” in the introductory language and inserted “or other” in paragraph (5); and added subsection (g).

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (f)(2), deleted the second sentence, which read, “If the recipient has elected to have the Department of Law collect the judgment of restitution under AS

12.55.051(g)

, the court shall forward all payments of restitution to the Department of Law within five days after the court’s acceptance.”

The 2021 amendment, effective July 9, 2021, in (e), twice inserted “, subject to AS

47.12.105

,”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 11(a), ch. 70, SLA 2005, provides that the 2005 amendment of (d) of this section and the provisions of (g) of this section “apply to offenses committed on or after July 14, 2005.”

Sec. 47.12.170.
Enforcement of restitution.

An order by the court under AS

47.12.120

that a minor or the minor’s parent pay restitution is a civil judgment that remains enforceable after the expiration of the court’s jurisdiction over the minor under AS

47.12.160

. A recipient of a restitution order, or the state on behalf of the restitution recipient, may enforce a restitution order against the minor and the minor’s parent by any procedure authorized by law for enforcement of a civil judgment. If the restitution recipient enforces or collects restitution through civil process, collection costs and full reasonable attorney fees shall be awarded. If the state on the restitution recipient’s behalf enforces or collects restitution through civil process, collection costs and full reasonable attorney fees shall be awarded, up to a maximum of twice the amount of restitution owing at the time the civil process was initiated. This section does not limit the authority of the court to otherwise enforce orders of payment for restitution. An order of restitution enforced under this section does not limit under other law the civil liability of the minor or the minor’s parent as a result of the delinquent conduct.

The Department of Law is authorized to collect restitution on behalf of the recipient unless

the recipient elects as provided in (c) of this section to enforce the order of restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law; or

the order requires restitution to be made in a form other than payment of a specific dollar amount.

The court shall forward a copy of the restitution order to the department and the office of victims’ rights when the order is entered. Upon receipt of the order, the department shall send a notice to the recipient regarding the recipient’s rights under this section, including the right to elect to enforce the order of restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law and of the possibility of, and procedure for, receiving payment from the restorative justice account. When 90 days have passed since the recipient received the notice, or when the department receives the recipient’s response to the notice, whichever is earlier, the department shall send to the Department of Law a copy of the order of restitution; the name, date of birth, social security number, and current address of the recipient, the minor, and the minor’s parent; the notice sent to the recipient under this subsection; and the recipient’s response, if any. If a response from the recipient reaches the department after the department has sent the order of restitution and other information to the Department of Law under this subsection, the department shall immediately send the response to the Department of Law. The information provided to the Department of Law and the office of victims’ rights under this subsection is confidential and is not open to inspection as a public record under AS

40.25.110

. The Department of Law, the office of victims’ rights, or agents for the Department of Law or office of victims’ rights may not disclose the information except as necessary to collect on the restitution.

The Department of Law may not begin collection procedures on the order of restitution until the recipient has been given notice under (c) of this section and has been given 90 days after receipt of notice to elect to collect the restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law. If the Department of Law receives a response to the notice before the 90-day period, the Department of Law may begin collection on the restitution. A recipient may inform the Department of Law at a later time of the recipient’s election to collect the restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law; upon receipt of the information, the Department of Law may no longer proceed with collection efforts on behalf of the recipient. A recipient who has elected under this section to collect restitution without the assistance of the Department of Law may not later request the services of that department to collect the restitution.

If the Department of Law or its agents proceed to collect restitution on behalf of a recipient under (c) of this section, the actions of the Department of Law or an agent of the Department of Law on behalf of the recipient do not create an attorney-client relationship between the Department of Law and the recipient. The Department of Law or its agent may not settle a judgment for restitution without the consent of the recipient of the restitution.

An action for damages may not be brought against the state or any of its agents, officers, or employees based on an action or omission under this section.

The Department of Law may enter into contracts on behalf of the state to carry out the collection procedures of this section. The Department of Law may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the collection procedures of this section, including the reimbursement of attorney fees and costs in appropriate cases.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; § 4 ch 144 SLA 1996; am §§ 37, 38 ch 92 SLA 2001; am §§ 4, 5 ch 23 SLA 2002; am §§ 12, 13 ch 21 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

47.10.086

by § 4, ch. 144, SLA 1996, with instructions in § 7, ch. 144, SLA 1996 to place it in AS 47.12 if the bill that later became ch. 59, SLA 1996 were enacted. Accordingly, the section was renumbered in 1996, at which time “AS

47.12.120

” was substituted in two places for “AS

47.10.080

,” pursuant to § 7, ch. 144, SLA 1996. Section 46, ch. 59, SLA 1996 also enacted a similar version of this section, but the § 4, ch. 144, SLA 1996 version is set out instead because its provisions subsumed the § 46, ch. 59, SLA 1996 provisions.

Cross references. —

For the effect of the 2001 amendment of subsection (a) of this section on Rule 82, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see § 42(a), ch. 92, SLA 2001, in the 2001 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (c), inserted “and the office of victims’ rights” following “the Department of Law” or similar, three times, added “and of the possibility of, and procedure for, receiving payment from the restorative justice account” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “When 90 days” for “When 30 days” at the beginning of the third sentence, inserted “for the Department of Law or office of victims’ rights” following “or agents” in the last sentence; in (d), in the first sentence, substituted “given 90 days” for “given 30 days” following “and has been”, added the second sentence.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 45, ch. 92, SLA 2001, provides that the amendment to subsection (a) and the addition of subsections (b) — (g), made by ch. 92, SLA 2001, apply “to judgments or orders of restitution entered in adjudications of delinquency of minors or in criminal cases before, on, or after January 1, 2002.”

Sec. 47.12.180.
Effect of adjudication.

Except as provided by AS

47.12.160(d)

and (e) and AS

47.12.170

, an adjudication under this chapter upon the status of a minor

may not operate to impose any of the civil disabilities ordinarily imposed by conviction upon a criminal charge;

does not operate to permit a minor afterward to be considered a criminal by the adjudication; and

does not operate to permit the adjudication to be afterward considered a conviction, nor may a minor be charged with or convicted of a crime in a court except as provided in this chapter.

The commitment and placement of a minor and evidence given in the court are not admissible as evidence against the minor in a subsequent case or proceedings in any other court, nor does the commitment and placement or evidence operate to disqualify a minor in a future civil service examination or appointment in the state.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 28 ch 107 SLA 1998)

Sec. 47.12.200.
Arrest of a minor.

The arrest of a minor other than for a traffic offense is not considered an arrest for any purpose except for the purpose of the disposition of a proceeding arising out of that arrest.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.12.210.
Fingerprinting of minors.

A peace officer may fingerprint a minor under the same circumstances as an adult may be fingerprinted.

Except as provided by AS

47.12.310(b)(1)

, fingerprint records taken under this section are not subject to AS

47.12.310

.

History.

(§ 46 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 29 ch 107 SLA 1998)